Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
REVENUE BONDS

§10-21 Definitions. Whenever used in
this part:

"Loan program" means the activities
and policies undertaken by the office to provide assistance to any department
of the State or to any county or board, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or
to private individuals or organizations, by making loans or causing loans to be
made available to them or by buying, refinancing, or guaranteeing loans made to
or other obligations incurred by them for the betterment of native Hawaiians.

"Office project" or
"project" means:

(1) The lawful acquisition of any property, real,
personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interests therein, pursuant
to section 10-4(2);

(2) Any capital improvement projects on lands held by
the office pursuant to section 10-4(2) or in the public land trust, including
but not limited to the construction of buildings and other improvements;
infrastructure development, and other enterprises which are acquired,
constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, improved, altered, or repaired by or
on behalf of the office;

(3) Pilot projects, demonstrations, or both, where
those projects or demonstrations fulfill criteria established by the board,
pursuant to section 10-5(7); and

(4) Any other projects determined by rules adopted by
the board pursuant to chapter 91 or otherwise authorized by the board in
accordance with applicable law to be for the betterment of native Hawaiians and
are consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

For purposes of this chapter, the term "office
project" or "project" may include projects of the foregoing
types that are undertaken by the office in cooperation with other governmental
entities or private individuals or organizations.

"Reserves" means reserves required or
permitted in the covenants in the resolution or resolutions of the board
authorizing the obtaining of loans or issuance of revenue bonds under this
part.

"Revenue bonds" means revenue bonds,
interim certificates, notes, debentures, or other evidence of indebtedness of
the board authorized by or issued under this part.

"Revenues of the office" or
"office's revenue" means all rates, rentals, fees and charges, and
user taxes, received by the office of Hawaiian affairs, and all money and
revenue derived from the operations of the office, other than:

(1) General appropriations; and

(2) Funds, the terms of which preclude their being
used for payment of the costs of acquisition, purchase, construction,
reconstruction, improvement, betterment, extension, or maintenance of an office
project or the costs of a loan program or the payment of principal or interest
of revenue bonds.

For purposes of the issuance of revenue bonds, the
office or any office project or projects shall constitute a public undertaking,
improvement, or system. [L 1994, c 283, pt of §2(2); am L 2009, c 146, §3; am L
2013, c 171, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next